Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Chapter 3. Agriculture and Industry Program

§ 57-3-1.
Statement of legislative policy.

It is hereby declared that the state public welfare demands, and the state public policy requires:

That a balanced economic development of this state is essential.

That the present and prospective health, safety, morals, pursuit of happiness, right of gainful employment and the general welfare of the citizens demand as a public purpose, the development within Mississippi of commercial, industrial, agricultural and manufacturing enterprises, herein called “enterprises” by the several counties, supervisors districts and municipalities, all herein called “municipalities.”

That the means and measures herein authorized to promote said enterprises are as a matter of public policy, for the public purposes of the several counties, supervisors districts, municipalities, and of the State of Mississippi.

That the present and prospective promotion of health, safety, morals, pursuit of happiness, right to gainful employment, and the general welfare of the state requires that herein and hereby authorized, and to that end the provisions hereof will help afford ready and attractive markets for farm and garden products, for the development of natural resources, and for the conversion of raw materials of farm, mine and forest into finished products for the general welfare of each of said municipalities, and of the entire people of the state.

That the accomplishment of the things herein authorized to be done by the several municipalities will give to them local benefits peculiar to each, and will accomplish the purposes set forth in this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-51; Laws, 1960, ch. 147, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 11, 1960).

§ 57-3-3.
Legislative intent; requirement of certificate.

It is the intent of the legislature by the passage of this chapter to authorize municipalities to acquire, own and lease projects for the purpose of promoting industry and trade by inducing manufacturing, and industrial enterprises to locate in this state, promoting the use of agricultural products and natural resources of this state, and promoting a sound and proper balance in this state between agriculture, commerce and industry. It is intended that each project be self-liquidating. This chapter shall be liberally construed in conformity with the said intent. The powers conferred upon the municipalities hereby shall be exercised only after such municipality has obtained a certificate of public convenience and necessity from the Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board in the manner and form as provided in Sections 57-1-19, 57-1-21, 57-1-23 and 57-1-27, with the exception that such board shall not be required to adjudicate either “that there are adequate property values and suitable financial conditions so that the total bonded indebtedness of the municipality, solely for the purposes authorized by this chapter, shall not exceed twenty per cent (20%) of the total assessed valuation of the property in the municipality,” nor that the enterprise “will not become a burden upon the taxpayers of the municipality,” the bonds authorized under this chapter being solely revenue bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-52; Laws, 1960, ch. 147, § 2; Laws, 1964, ch. 217, § 1; Laws, 1966, ch. 235, § 1, eff from and after August 1, 1966.

§ 57-3-5.
Definitions.

Wherever used in this chapter, unless a different meaning clearly appears in the context, the following terms, whether used in the singular or plural, shall be given the following respective interpretations:

“Municipality” means any county, supervisors district, incorporated city, town or village in the State of Mississippi;

“Project” means land, buildings, improvements, fixtures, machinery, equipment and furnishings, and all real and personal properties deemed necessary in connection therewith, or any part or combination of parts of the foregoing, whether or not now in existence, which shall be suitable for use by any of the following or by any combination thereof:

Any industrial enterprise for the manufacturing, processing or assembling of any products of agriculture, mining or industry;

Any industrial enterprise for storing or warehousing products of agriculture, mining or industry;

Any industrial or commercial enterprise for distributing any products of agriculture, mining or industry;

Any enterprise for the purpose of research in connection with:

Any of the foregoing;

The development of new products or processes; or

The improvement of existing products or known processes;

Any industrial enterprise for national, regional or divisional offices or facilities in connection with the management, supervision or service of its manufacturing, processing, assembling, storing, warehousing, distribution or research operations, wherever located; but does not include facilities designed for the sale or distribution to the public of electricity, gas, water, telephone or other services commonly classified as public utilities;

Any enterprise allowed under Section 144(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986;

Any conference center, or any final destination or resort hotel having a minimum of one hundred fifty (150) rooms, or any combination of the foregoing; or

Any theme park or movie industry production studio, or any combination thereof, which would employ a minimum of two hundred (200) net full-time employees.

“Governing body” means the board or body in which the legislative powers of the municipality are vested, and as to supervisors districts such board or body shall be the county board of supervisors, acting with the consent of the member from the district affected;

“Mortgage” means a mortgage, indenture of trust, deed of trust or any other instrument securing bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-53; Laws, 1960, ch. 147, § 3; Laws, 1963, 1st Ex. Sess. ch. 27, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 419, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 433, § 2; Laws, 1986, ch. 390; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 71, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved June 30, 1990).

§ 57-3-7.
Construction of chapter.

Neither this chapter nor anything herein contained shall be construed as a restriction or limitation upon any powers which a municipality might otherwise have under laws of this state nor to limit or change the provisions of Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51, but shall be construed as cumulative; nor shall the bonds issued hereunder be affected by or counted in connection with any statutory limitation upon the amount of bonds which otherwise may be issued by such municipality. The bonds herein authorized may be issued in addition to any bonds issued under Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51, and without regard to the amount of any other bonds issued or outstanding.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-67; Laws, 1960, ch. 147, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved May 11, 1960).

§ 57-3-9.
Additional powers conferred on municipalities.

In addition to any other powers which it may now have, each municipality shall have the following powers: (a) to acquire, whether by construction, purchase, gift or lease, one or more projects, which shall be located within the State of Mississippi and may be located within or without the municipality, or partially within or partially without the municipality, but which shall not be located more than fifteen (15) miles outside of the boundary limits of the municipality; provided, however, that when any such project shall be located in whole or in part outside the municipal or incorporated boundaries of any city, town or village of this state the powers granted under this chapter shall not be exercised by a city, town or village until a resolution approving such project has been duly adopted and spread upon the official minutes of the board of supervisors of the county in which such city, town or village is located. The municipality is authorized to negotiate a contract for the acquisition, construction and erection of a project or any portion of a project hereunder (i) where the municipality finds that, because of the secret nature of such project or any portion thereof, or because such project or any portion thereof will be used for the manufacture of products to be utilized by the United States of America in the national defense, public bidding thereon, pursuant to advertisement therefor, is not in the public interest; and provided, further, such finding is approved, through issuance of appropriate certificate or resolution of approval, by the Department of Economic and Community Development, or (ii) where the municipality finds that, because of the particular nature of said project or any portion thereof, it would be in the best public interest of the municipality so to negotiate, and such finding is approved, through issuance of appropriate certificate or resolution of approval, by the Department of Economic and Community Development; (b) to lease or sell to others any or all of its projects for such rentals and upon such terms and conditions as the governing body may deem advisable and as shall not be in conflict with the provisions of this chapter; and (c) to issue revenue bonds for the purposes of defraying the cost of acquiring any project, and to secure the payment of such bonds, as hereinafter provided.

No municipality shall have the power to operate any project as a business or in any manner under this chapter except as a lessor thereof.

The municipality issuing bonds to acquire a project under this chapter shall maintain a record of the location of projects for which the proceeds of such bonds are expended and the amount expended at each location. Such record shall indicate the purpose, amount, date and recipient of each expenditure made out of the proceeds of such bonds. If a trustee has been named pursuant to Section 57-3-21, the trustee shall make timely reports to the clerk of the municipality setting forth the details required in the preceding sentence with respect to the expenditure of bond proceeds. Such records shall be maintained as public records in the office of the clerk of the municipality and shall be available for inspection and duplication during the regular office hours of the municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-54; Laws, 1960, ch. 147, § 4; Laws, 1963, 1st Ex. Sess. ch. 27, § 2; Laws, 1964, ch. 217, § 2; Laws, 1964, 1st Ex. Sess. ch. 13; Laws, 1966, ch. 235, § 2; Laws, 1976, ch. 419, § 2; Laws, 1979, ch. 364; Laws, 1980, ch. 411; Laws, 1996, ch. 403, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1996.

§ 57-3-11.
Requirement of bond issue election.

Before issuing any bonds hereunder the governing body, as hereinbefore defined, of any municipality, as hereinbefore defined, shall adopt a resolution declaring its intention so to do stating the amount of bonds proposed to be issued, the purpose for which the bonds are to be issued, and the date upon which the governing body proposes to direct the issuance of such bonds. Such resolution shall be published once a week for at least three (3) consecutive weeks in at least one (1) newspaper published in the county in which such municipality is located. The first publication of such resolution shall be made not less than twenty-one (21) days prior to the date fixed in such resolution for the issuance of the bonds and the last publication shall be made not more than seven (7) days prior to such date. If no newspaper be published in such county, then such notice shall be given by publishing the resolution for the required time in some newspaper having a general circulation in such county, and, in addition, by posting a copy of such resolution for at least twenty-one (21) days next preceding the date fixed therein at three (3) public places in such county. If twenty per centum (20%) of the qualified electors of the municipality shall file a written protest against the issuance of such bonds on or before the date specified in such resolution, then an election on the question of the issuance of such bonds shall be called and held as herein provided. If no such protest be filed, then such bonds may be issued without an election on the question of the issuance thereof, at any time within a period of two (2) years after the date specified in the above-mentioned resolution. However, the governing body of such municipality, in its discretion, may nevertheless call an election on such question, in which event it shall not be necessary to publish the resolution declaring its intention to issue bonds as herein provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-55; Laws, 1960, ch. 147, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved May 11, 1960).

§ 57-3-13.
Notice of election.

Where an election is to be called as provided in Section 57-3-11, notice of such election shall be signed by the clerk of the governing body of any municipality, and shall be published once a week for at least three (3) consecutive weeks, in at least one (1) newspaper published in such county. The first publication of such notice shall be made not less than twenty-one (21) days prior to the date fixed for such election and the last publication shall be made not more than seven (7) days prior to such date. If no newspaper is published in such county, then such notice shall be given by publishing the same for the required time in some newspaper having a general circulation in such county, and, in addition, by posting a copy of such notice for at least twenty-one (21) days next preceding such election at three (3) public places in such county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-56; Laws, 1960, ch. 147, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved May 11, 1960).

§ 57-3-15.
Conduct of election; form of ballot.

The election provided for in Section 57-3-11 shall be held, as far as is practicable, in the same manner as other elections are held in municipalities. At such election, all qualified electors of such municipality may vote, and the ballots used at such election shall have printed thereon a brief statement of the amount and purpose of the proposed bond issue and the words “FOR THE BOND ISSUE” and “AGAINST THE BOND ISSUE,” and the voter shall vote by placing a cross (x) or check mark (Π) opposite his choice on the proposition.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-57; Laws, 1960, ch. 147, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved May 11, 1960).

§ 57-3-17.
Determination of results of election; time period for issuance of bonds.

When the results of the election on the question of the issuance of such bonds as hereinabove provided for shall have been canvassed by the election commissioners of such municipality and certified by them to the governing body of such municipality, it shall be the duty of such governing body to determine and adjudicate whether or not a majority of the qualified electors who voted thereon in such election voted in favor of the issuance of such bonds, and unless a majority of the qualified electors who voted thereon in such election shall have voted in favor of the issuance of such bonds, then such bonds shall not be issued. Should a majority of the qualified electors who vote thereon in such election vote in favor of the issuance of such bonds, then the governing body of the municipality may issue such bonds, either in whole or in part, within two (2) years from the date of such election, or within two (2) years after the final favorable termination of any litigation affecting the issuance of such bonds, as such governing body shall deem best.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-58; Laws, 1960, ch. 147, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved May 11, 1960).

§ 57-3-19.
Nature of bonds; payment of principal and interest; applicability of debt limitation; terms, conditions, execution, delivery, etc., of bonds; disposition of proceeds from sale of bonds.

All bonds issued by a municipality under authority of this chapter shall be limited obligations of the municipality, the principal of and interest on which shall be payable solely out of the revenue derived from the leasing of the project to finance which bonds are issued. Bonds and interest coupons issued under authority of this chapter shall never constitute an indebtedness of the municipality within the meaning of any state constitutional provision or statutory limitation, and shall never constitute nor give rise to a pecuniary liability of the municipality or a charge against its general credit or taxing powers, and such fact shall be plainly stated in the face of each such bond. Such bonds may be executed and delivered at any time and from time to time, may be in such form and denominations and may bear interest irrespective of any interest rate limitation; may be of such tenor, may be in registered or bearer form either as to principal or interest or both, may be payable in such installments and at such time or times not exceeding thirty (30) years from their date, may be payable at such place or places and evidenced in such manner, and may contain such provisions not inconsistent herewith, all as shall be provided in the proceedings of the governing body whereunder the bonds shall be authorized to be issued. Any bonds issued under the authority of this chapter may be sold at public or private sale from time to time in such manner and at such price as may be determined by the governing body to be most advantageous, and the municipality may pay all expenses, premiums and commissions which the governing body may deem necessary or advantageous in connection with the authorization, sale and issuance thereof. All bonds issued under the authority of this chapter and all interest coupons applicable thereto shall be construed to be negotiable instruments, despite the fact that they are payable solely from a specified source.

Any funds received from the sale of bonds issued under this chapter, including accrued interest thereon, which are not required for immediate disbursement for the purpose for which issued may be invested at the direction of the enterprise in any one or more of the following:

Bonds or other obligations of the United States;

Bonds or other obligations, the payment of the principal and interest of which is unconditionally guaranteed by the United States;

Direct obligations issued by the United States of America or obligations guaranteed in full as to principal and interest by the United States of America, maturing or subject to a repurchase agreement with a qualified state depository bank maturing on or before the date when such funds will be required for disbursement;

Certificates of deposit issued by qualified depositories of the State of Mississippi as approved by the State Depository Commission;

Prime commercial paper;

Bankers’ acceptances drawn on and accepted by commercial banks.

Any other investment authorized by any bank, savings bank, savings and loan association, insurance company or similar institutional investor, or combination thereof, which, at the time of authorization, is the owner of all of the bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-59; Laws, 1960, ch. 147, § 9; Laws, 1964, ch. 217, § 3; Laws, 1966, ch. 235, § 3; Laws, 1968, ch. 558, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 451; Laws, 1977, ch. 415; Laws, 1978, ch. 491, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 456, § 2; Laws, 1980, ch. 433, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 459, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 453, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 541, § 31; Laws, 1984, ch. 506, § 10; Laws, 1993, ch. 397, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 16, 1993).

§ 57-3-21.
Security for payment of bonds.

The principal of, redemption premium, if any, and interest on any bonds issued under the authority of this chapter shall be secured by a pledge of the revenues derived from the lease or sale of the project, may be secured by a mortgage covering all or any part of the project or any additional property granted as security for the bonds, may be secured by a pledge of the lease of such project and may be secured by such additional security as the governing body shall require. The proceedings under which such bonds are authorized to be issued or any such mortgage may contain any agreements and provisions customarily contained in instruments securing bonds, including, without limitation, the generality of the foregoing provisions respecting the fixing and collection of rents for any projects, covered by such proceedings or mortgage, the terms to be incorporated in the lease of such project, the maintenance and insurance of such project, to include the establishment of an escrow or reserve fund for deposits of advance insurance premiums, the creation and maintenance of special funds from revenues from such project, and rights and remedies available in event of default to the bondholders or to the trustee under a mortgage, all as the governing body shall deem advisable and as shall not be in conflict with the provisions of this chapter. However, in making such agreements or provisions, a municipality shall not have the power to obligate itself except with respect to the project and application of revenues therefrom and shall not have the power to incur a pecuniary liability or a charge upon its general credit or against its taxing powers. The proceedings authorizing any bonds hereunder and any mortgage securing such bonds may provide that, in the event of default in payment of principal of, or the interest on, such bonds, or in the performance of any agreement contained in such proceedings or mortgage, such payment and performance may be enforced by mandamus or by the appointment of a receiver in equity with power to charge and collect rents and to apply the revenues from the project in accordance with such proceedings or the provisions of such mortgage. Any such mortgage may provide also that, in the event of default in such payment or the violation of any agreement contained therein, it may be foreclosed either by sale at public outcry or by proceedings in equity, and may provide that any trustee under such mortgage or the holder of any of the bonds secured thereby may become the purchaser at any foreclosure sale if the highest bidder therefor. No breach of any such agreement shall impose any pecuniary liability upon a municipality or any charge upon its general credit or against its taxing powers. The trustee or any trustees under any mortgage or any depository specified by such mortgage may be such persons or corporations as the governing body shall designate, including nonresidents of Mississippi and banks or trust companies incorporated under the laws of the United States or the laws of other states of the United States. When any municipal property acquired under the authority of this chapter becomes vacant, through unforeseen circumstances, such as default by the lessee, the municipality may exercise the authority contained in Sections 19-7-7 and 21-37-45, Mississippi Code of 1972, to have this property insured and the cost thereof paid out of the municipal treasury until such a time as the property is again leased.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-60; Laws, 1960, ch. 147, § 10; Laws, 1964, ch. 217, § 4; Laws, 1966, ch. 235, § 4; Laws, 1976, ch. 419, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 5, 1976).

§ 57-3-23.
Requirements respecting lease of projects.

Prior to the leasing of any project, the governing body must determine and find the following: the amount necessary in each year to pay the principal of and the interest on the bonds proposed to be issued to finance such project; the amount necessary to be paid each year into any reserve funds, which amounts may include deposits in escrow or reserve amounts as advance sums for the payment of insurance, which the governing body may deem it advisable to establish in connection with the retirement of the proposed bonds and the maintenance of the project; and, unless the terms under which the project is to be leased provide that the lessee shall maintain the project and carry all proper insurance with respect thereto, the estimated cost of maintaining the project in good repair and keeping it properly insured. The determinations and findings of the governing body required to be made in the preceding sentence shall be set forth in the proceedings under which the proposed bonds are to be issued; and prior to the issuance of such bonds, the municipality shall lease the project to a lessee under an agreement conditioned upon completion of the project and providing for payment to the municipality of such rentals as, upon the basis of such determinations and findings, will be sufficient (a) to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds issued to finance the project, (b) to build up and maintain any reserve deemed by the governing body to be advisable in connection therewith, and (c) unless the agreement of lease obligated the lessee to pay for the maintenance and insurance of the project, to pay the cost of maintaining the project in good repair and keeping it properly insured. Such lease shall be made upon such other terms and conditions and for the time which may be determined by the municipality and may contain provisions authorizing the purchase of the entire project or any portion thereof by the industry or its assignee after all bonds (if any) issued thereunder have been paid in full, for such consideration and upon such terms and conditions as the municipality may determine.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-61; Laws, 1960, ch. 147, § 11; Laws, 1964, ch. 217, § 5; Laws, 1966, ch. 235, § 5, eff from and after August 1, 1966.

§ 57-3-25.
Refunding bonds.

Any bonds issued hereunder and at any time outstanding may at any time and from time to time be refunded by a municipality by the issuance of its refunding bonds in such amount as the governing body may deem necessary but not exceeding an amount sufficient to refund the principal of the bonds so to be refunded, together with any unpaid interest thereon and any premiums and commissions necessary to be paid in connection therewith. Any such refunding may be effected whether the bonds to be refunded shall have been matured or shall thereafter mature, either by sale of the refunding bonds and the application of the proceeds thereof for the payment of the bonds to be refunded thereby, or by exchange of the refunding bonds for the bonds to be refunded thereby, provided that the holders of any bonds so to be refunded shall not be compelled without their consent to surrender their bonds for payment or exchange prior to the date on which they are payable or, if they are called for redemption, prior to the date on which they are by their terms subject to redemption. Any refunding bonds issued under the authority of this section shall be payable solely from the revenues out of which the bonds to be refunded hereby were payable, and shall be subject to the provisions contained in Section 57-3-11, and may be secured in accordance with the provisions of Section 57-3-21.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-62; Laws, 1960, ch. 147, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved May 11, 1960).

§ 57-3-27.
Use of proceeds from sale of bonds.

The proceeds from the sale of any bonds issued under authority of this chapter shall be applied only for the purpose for which the bonds were issued. However, any accrued interest and premium received in any such sale shall be applied to the payment of the principal of or the interest on the bonds sold; and, if for any reason, any portion of such proceeds shall not be needed for the purpose for which the bonds were issued, then such unneeded portion of said proceeds shall be applied to the payment of the principal of or the interest on said bonds. The cost of acquiring any project shall be deemed to include the following: the actual cost of the construction of any part of a project which may be constructed, including equipment, machinery, facilities, attorney’s, architect’s and engineer’s fees; abstracts, cost of preparing and recording warranty deeds; the purchase price of any part of a project that may be acquired by purchase; the deposit into a reserve or escrow fund advance payments for insurance, in the event that the prospective lessee shall be in default of any payments and the municipality has to take over the operation of said project; all expenses in connection with the authorization, sale and issuance of the bonds to finance such acquisition; and the interest on such bonds for a reasonable time prior to construction, during construction, and for not exceeding six (6) months after completion of construction. Proceeds of said bonds shall be placed in the municipal treasury or with the trustee named in the mortgage or indentured trust as provided in Section 57-3-21 as a special fund and shall be used for no other purpose than the purpose set forth in the original resolution, and any officer diverting or assisting to divert any such fund to any other purpose than the purpose originally set forth in said resolution of the governing authority of said municipality shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, shall be punished accordingly, and shall also be liable both personally and on his official bond for such diversion, together with the costs of collection and reasonable attorney’s fees. The Mississippi Agricultural and Industrial Board is authorized to employ necessary competent attorneys to proceed by action for injunction or mandamus to require compliance with said original resolution by any officer or municipal board.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-63; Laws, 1960, ch. 147, § 13; Laws, 1964, ch. 217, § 6; Laws, 1966, ch. 235, § 6; Laws, 1978, ch. 491, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1978.

§ 57-3-29.
Contribution by municipalities to projects; acceptance of donations by municipalities.

No municipality shall have the power to pay out of its general funds or otherwise contribute any part of the costs of acquiring a project, but, the entire cost of acquiring any project must be paid out of the proceeds from the sale of bonds issued under the authority of this chapter. This provision shall not be construed to prevent a municipality from accepting donation of property to be used as a part of any such project or money to be used for defraying any part of the cost of any such project.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-64; Laws, 1960, ch. 147, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved May 11, 1960).

§ 57-3-31.
Investment in bonds.

Bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter shall be legal investments for savings banks and insurance companies organized under the laws of this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-65; Laws, 1960, ch. 147, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved May 11, 1960).

§ 57-3-33.
Exemption from taxation of bonds, etc.; time limit for ad valorem tax exemption.

The bonds authorized by this chapter, the income therefrom, all mortgages or deeds of trust executed as security therefor, all lease or purchase agreements made pursuant to the provisions hereof, and all purchases required to establish the enterprise and financed by bond proceeds shall be exempt from all taxation in the State of Mississippi except the contractors’ tax imposed by Section 27-65-21 and the tax levied by Section 27-65-24(1)(b) and all projects and the revenue derived from any lease thereof shall be exempt from all taxation in the State of Mississippi, except the tax levied by Sections 27-65-21 and 27-65-24(1)(b). From and after July 1, 1989, there shall be no new exemption under this section or under Chapter 10, Title 57, Mississippi Code of 1972, from ad valorem taxes levied for school district purposes. The time of any ad valorem tax exemption provided for hereunder shall not exceed a total of ten (10) years, which shall run from the date of completion of the project. In no event shall the term of the ad valorem tax exemption provided for hereunder be limited, terminated or otherwise affected by payment in full of the bonds issued under this chapter or by the change from a leasehold to a fee title in the enterprise financed with bonds issued under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8936-66; Laws, 1960, ch. 147, § 16; Laws, 1964, ch. 217, § 7; Laws, 1966, ch. 235, § 7; Laws, 1989, ch. 524, § 22; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 71, § 4; Laws, 1992, ch. 518, § 4; Laws, 1995, ch. 355, § 2; Laws, 2010, ch. 449, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2010.